
−DIAGNOSTICS MULTIPLEX COMMUNICATION SYSTEM
DI−843

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

DTC B1272 / 72 Power seat ECU communication stop
(w/ Seat memory vehicle only)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This DTC is output when communication stops between power seat ECU and Body No.1 ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B1272/72 N i ti  f t ECU th 10 d
S Power seat ECU

B1272/72 No communication from seat ECU more than 10 seconds.
SPower seat ECU
SWireharness

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI−836.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 CheckpowerseatECU.

CHECK:
Check that the operation of front vertical and rear vertical is normal.
HINT:
With this inspection, the power seat ECU CPU can be diagnosed if it works normally or not.

NG Replace the power seat ECU.

OK
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2 Check wireharness

PREPARATION:
Disconnect connector body ECU, power seat ECU and tilt &
telescopic ECU.
CHECK:
(a)Checkcontinuitybetween terminalsMPX 1 ofbodyECU

and MPX2 of power seat ECU.
(b)Checkcontinuitybetween terminalsMPX 1 ofpowerseat

ECU and MPX2 of tilt & telescopic ECU.
OK:
There is a continuity in wireharness.

NG Repair or replace wireharness.

OK

Replace power seat ECU.


